Hawaii, session 2026, HB2481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 346, Part XVIII, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346- Return-to-Home Program.  (a) The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions shall coordinate a voluntary homeless assistance program, to be known as the return-to-home program, to provide eligible homeless individuals with assistance in being reunited with family and relatives in the individual's home state. The office shall establish a public-private partnership by contracting with eligible nonprofit organizations, for-profit organizations, or foundations to administer the program without regard to chapters 103D and 103F.  The governor's coordinator on homelessness may assist with the implementation of this program. (b)  An individual who is homeless shall be eligible to participate in the return-to-home program if: (1)  The individual's participation is completely voluntary; (2)  The individual, if on parole, probation, or awaiting a court hearing or sentencing, has proper clearance from the court to participate in the program; and (3)  The individual is indigent and lacks the financial resources necessary to secure transportation to return to the individual's home state. (c)  An individual shall participate in the return-to-home program only once and shall sign an agreement to this effect before participating in the program.  The agreement shall be kept on file with the statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions. (d)  The return-to-home program shall actively seek the participation of local airlines, cruise lines, charter companies, homeless programs, travel agencies, and the visitor industry to coordinate and implement the program. (e)  The return-to-home program shall assist program participants with necessary and proper preparations for travel, including obtaining proper identification, accessing public transportation to the airport, providing orientation relating to airport security, and ensuring sufficient personal hygiene. (f)  The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations relating to the return-to-home program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the return-to-home program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________